Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 4
LICENSING AND REGULATION OF
BROKER-DEALERS AND SALES REPRESENTATIVES

11-51-401. Licensing and notice filing requirements.

A person shall not transact business in this state as a broker-dealer or sales representative unless licensed or exempt from licensing under section 11-51-402.

(1.5) A person with a place of business in this state shall not transact business in this state as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative unless such person is licensed as such or exempt from licensing under section 11-51-402.

(1.6) A federal covered adviser either with a place of business in this state or who employs or otherwise engages an individual with a place of business in this state to act as an investment adviser representative shall not transact business in this state as a federal covered adviser unless such adviser has filed with the securities commissioner the notice and fee required in sections 11-51-403 and 11-51-404.

Neither a broker-dealer nor an issuer shall employ or otherwise engage an individual to act as a sales representative in this state unless the sales representative is licensed or exempt from licensing under section 11-51-402.

(2.5) An investment adviser shall not employ or otherwise engage any individual with a place of business in this state to act as an investment adviser representative in this state unless such individual is licensed in accordance with section 11-51-403 or is exempt from licensing under section 11-51-402 (1).

No broker-dealer, investment adviser, or issuer shall employ or otherwise engage a person to participate in any activity in this state contrary to an order by the securities commissioner applicable to that person under section 11-51-410. A broker-dealer, investment adviser, or issuer does not violate this subsection (3) if the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or issuer sustains the burden of proof that it did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the order. Upon request from a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or issuer and for good cause shown, the securities commissioner may waive the prohibition of this subsection (3) with respect to a person subject to an order under section 11-51-410.

No person shall act as an investment adviser for a local government investment pool trust fund under article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., unless the person has first notified the securities commissioner by filing the form prescribed by the securities commissioner.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 720, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1.5), (1.6), (2.5), and (4) added and (3) amended, p. 550, § 4, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-105 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning the use of the term "transacting business in this state" in subsections (1.5), (1.6), and (2.5) of this section, see § 11-51-102 (8); for the applicability of subsections (1) and (2), see § 11-51-102 (1) and (2).

11-51-402. Exempt broker-dealers, sales representatives - sanctions - exempt investment advisers and investment adviser representatives.

The following broker-dealers are exempt from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1):

A broker-dealer who is registered as a broker-dealer under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" and has no place of business in this state if the business transacted in this state as a broker-dealer is exclusively with the following:

Issuers in transactions involving their own securities;

Other broker-dealers licensed or exempt from licensing under this article, except when the broker-dealer is acting as a clearing broker-dealer for such other broker-dealers;

Financial or institutional investors;

Individuals who are existing customers of the broker-dealer and whose principal places of residence are not in this state;

During any twelve consecutive months, not more than five persons in this state, excluding persons described in subparagraphs (I) to (IV) of this paragraph (a);

Other broker-dealers the securities commissioner by rule or order exempts; and

An online intermediary operating pursuant to section 11-51-308.5.

The following sales representatives are exempt from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1):

A sales representative employed or otherwise engaged by a broker-dealer exempt under subsection (1) of this section;

A sales representative employed or otherwise engaged by an issuer in effecting transactions only in securities exempted by section 11-51-307 (1)(a) to (1)(d) or (1)(j);

A sales representative employed by an issuer in effecting transactions only with employees, partners, officers, or directors of the issuer or of a parent or subsidiaries of the issuer, if no commission or other similar compensation is paid or given directly or indirectly to the sales representative for soliciting an employee, partner, officer, or director in this state; and

Other sales representatives the securities commissioner by rule or order exempts.

Any real estate broker or salesperson licensed pursuant to part 2 of article 10 of title 12 who is trading only in securities comprised of notes, bonds, or evidences of indebtedness secured by mortgages or deeds of trust upon real estate, where the broker or salesperson acts as the agent for the buyer or seller of the real estate securing the note, bond, or evidence of indebtedness being traded and is neither the issuer nor affiliated with or under the direct or indirect control of the issuer or an affiliate of the issuer of the note, bond, or evidence of indebtedness, is exempt from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1).

The securities commissioner may by order revoke, suspend, or impose conditions upon exemptions available pursuant to subparagraph (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section if the securities commissioner finds that a broker-dealer or sales representative who has an exemption pursuant to either of said sections offered or sold, other than in an unsolicited transaction, to a public entity in the state of Colorado a financial instrument that such broker-dealer or sales representative knew or should have known does not qualify for sale to the public entity pursuant to section 24-75-601.1, C.R.S., and that such action by the securities commissioner is in the public interest.

Any proceeding concerning an order made pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be conducted as a proceeding under section 11-51-606 (1), (2), (4), and (5).

The following investment advisers with no place of business in this state are exempt from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1.5):

An investment adviser who:

Is exempt from registration as an investment adviser pursuant to section 203 (b) of the federal "Investment Advisers Act of 1940";

Has only clients in this state that are: Other investment advisers; federal covered advisers; broker-dealers; depository institutions; insurance companies; employee benefit plans with assets of not less than one million dollars; or other institutional investors other than any local government investment pool trust fund under article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., as are designated by rule or order of the securities commissioner; or

During the preceding twelve-month period, has had not more than five clients other than those specified in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a).

The commissioner may by rule or order exempt other investment advisers from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1.5).

Investment adviser representatives employed by or otherwise associated with an investment adviser exempt under subsection (5) of this section are exempt from the license requirement of section 11-51-401 (1.5).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 721, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) added, p. 773, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 98:

(5) and (6) added, p. 550, § 5, effective January 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(6) amended, p. 619, § 10, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1988, § 23, effective May 22.

L. 2015:

IP(1), (1)(a)(V), and (1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, (HB 15-1246), ch. 98, p. 287, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1659, § 59, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-105 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see Pub.L. 73-291, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.; for the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940", see Pub.L. 76-768, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.

11-51-403. Application for license - notice filing requirements.

An applicant for a license as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative shall file with the securities commissioner or with the securities commissioner's designee an application for a license and the consent to service of process required by section 11-51-706. The application shall contain the information and be in the form the securities commissioner requires by rule. If the information contained in an application is inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect when the application is filed or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect as a result of any subsequent event, the applicant shall promptly file an amendment to the application to cure the inaccuracy or omission. The securities commissioner may require an applicant to submit additional information that is material to an understanding of information about the applicant available to the securities commissioner in the application or otherwise, and an application shall be incomplete until all additional information required by the securities commissioner has been submitted.

The application requirement of subsection (1) of this section for broker-dealers and sales representatives is satisfied by an applicant who has filed and maintains complete and current registration information with the securities and exchange commission, in the case of a broker-dealer, or a self-regulatory organization, in the case of a sales representative, if that registration information and the consent to service of process required by section 11-51-706 are provided to the securities commissioner through the central registration depository. Any additional information the securities commissioner may require from such an applicant pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be material to an understanding of information about the broker-dealer or sales representative that is provided to the securities commissioner through the central registration depository.

(2.5) The application requirement of subsection (1) of this section for an investment adviser and an investment adviser representative is satisfied by an applicant who has filed and maintains complete and current registration information with the investment adviser registration depository if that registration information and the consent to service of process required by section 11-51-706 are provided to the securities commissioner through the investment adviser registration depository. Any additional information the securities commissioner may require from such an applicant pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be material to an understanding of information about the investment adviser or investment adviser representative that is provided to the securities commissioner through the investment adviser registration depository.

A federal covered adviser who, during any calendar year, either has a place of business in this state or employs or engages an investment adviser representative with a place of business in this state shall file with the securities commissioner annually a consent to service of process and such documents as are filed by such adviser with the securities and exchange commission that the commissioner may require by rule or order.

The notice filing requirement described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) does not apply to any federal covered adviser who, during such calendar year, neither has a place of business in this state nor employs nor engages an investment adviser representative with a place of business in this state.

A notice filing under this section shall be effective from its receipt by the securities commissioner until December 31 of each year. Thereafter, it may be renewed annually until the following December 31 by filing with the securities commissioner a copy of such documents as are required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) and payment of a fee pursuant to section 11-51-404.

Any person required to pay a fee under this section may transmit through any designee of the securities commissioner any fee required by this section or by rules promulgated under this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 722, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 551, § 6, effective April 30.

L. 2001:

(1) amended and (2.5) and (4) added, p. 15, § 2, effective March 9.

11-51-404. License and notice fees.

An applicant for a license as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative shall pay an initial license fee, and a licensed person shall pay an annual license fee, determined and collected by the division of securities pursuant to section 11-51-707.

A federal covered adviser required to file an annual notice with the securities commissioner pursuant to section 11-51-403 (3)(a) shall pay an annual notice fee that shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707.

If an annual license fee is not paid within ninety days after the application is filed, the securities commissioner may deem the application to be withdrawn.

If an annual license or notice fee is not paid within thirty days after the securities commissioner sends a written notice that the fee was not paid when due, the amount of the annual license fee shall be double the amount originally payable.
(3) (a) (I) If an annual license or notice fee is not paid within thirty days after the securities commissioner sends a written notice that the fee was not paid when due, the amount of the annual license fee shall be double the amount originally payable.

In the case of a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered adviser, written notice is deemed sent when the notice is sent to the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered adviser.

In the case of a sales representative, written notice is deemed sent to the sales representative when the notice is sent to a broker-dealer or an issuer for whom the sales representative is licensed to act.

In the case of an investment adviser representative, written notice is deemed sent when the notice is sent to the investment adviser or federal covered adviser for whom the investment adviser representative is licensed to act.

If an annual license or notice fee is not paid within sixty days after the securities commissioner sends the written notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the securities commissioner may by order summarily suspend the license or, in the case of a federal covered adviser, the authority to do business in this state.

In the case of a broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered adviser, the securities commissioner shall send a copy of the order to the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered adviser whose license or authority to do business in this state has been summarily suspended.

In the case of a sales representative who has been licensed to act for a broker-dealer or an issuer and whose license has been summarily suspended, the securities commissioner shall send a copy of the order to a broker-dealer or an issuer for whom the sales representative has been licensed to act.

In the case of an investment adviser representative who has been licensed to act for an investment adviser or federal covered adviser and whose license has been summarily suspended, the securities commissioner shall send a copy of the order to the investment adviser or federal covered adviser for whom the investment adviser representative has been licensed to act.

If the annual license or notice fee is not paid within thirty days after the effective date of an order of summary suspension, the securities commissioner may by order summarily revoke the license or authority to do business in this state on the grounds that the license or authority has been abandoned.

If an application is denied or withdrawn, or a license or authority to do business in this state is abandoned, revoked, suspended, or withdrawn, the securities commissioner shall retain all fees paid.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 722, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 552, § 7, effective April 30.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 15-104), ch. 177, p. 578, § 6, effective May 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-106 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-405. Examinations and alternate qualifications.

In the case of a license as a broker-dealer, if the applicant is not registered as a broker-dealer under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", the securities commissioner may by rule require the successful completion of a standardized written examination by any individual who will have primary responsibility to supervise any licensed sales representative of the broker-dealer. In the case of an application for a license as a sales representative to act for a broker-dealer who is not registered as a broker-dealer under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" or to act for an issuer, the securities commissioner may by rule require the successful completion of a standardized written examination by the applicant. Examinations may differ among classes of applicants. Any examination may be administered by the securities commissioner or any person the securities commissioner may designate.

An applicant for a license as a broker-dealer or sales representative who is a licensed real estate broker or salesperson pursuant to part 2 of article 10 of title 12 and whose securities activities in this state are limited to trading in securities comprised of notes, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness secured by mortgages or deeds of trust upon real estate shall be excused from any examination requirement under subsection (1) of this section.

In the case of a license as an investment adviser representative, the securities commissioner may by rule require the successful completion of one or more standardized written examinations. Examinations may differ among classes of applicants. Any examination may be administered by the securities commissioner or any person the securities commissioner may designate.

The securities commissioner may by rule designate other qualifications and credentials that will be accepted in lieu of meeting the examination requirement set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 723, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) and (4) added, p. 553, § 8, effective January 1, 1999.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1989, § 24, effective May 22.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1659, § 60, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-106 (2.1) as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see Pub.L. 73-291, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

11-51-406. General provisions.

Unless a proceeding under section 11-51-410 is instituted, the license of a broker-dealer, sales representative, or investment adviser representative becomes effective upon the last to occur of the following:

The passage of thirty days after the filing of the application or, in the event any amendment is filed before the license becomes effective, the passage of thirty days after the filing of the latest amendment, if the application, including all amendments, if any, was complete at the commencement of the thirty-day period;

The examination requirement under section 11-51-405 is satisfied;

In the case of a broker-dealer, the requirements of section 11-51-407 are satisfied; and

The required fee has been paid.

The securities commissioner may authorize an earlier effective date of licensing.

A notice filing by a federal covered adviser becomes effective upon receipt by the securities commissioner of the documents and fee required to be filed pursuant to sections 11-51-403 and 11-51-404.

The securities commissioner may by rule or order, waive or reduce any of the requirements of this section and sections 11-51-405 and 11-51-407 with respect to any person or class of persons and, in connection with the waiver or reduction of any requirement, may limit or impose conditions on the securities activities that such person or class of persons may conduct in this state.

The license of a sales representative is effective only with respect to actions taken for a broker-dealer or issuer for whom the sales representative is licensed.

The license of an investment adviser representative is effective only with respect to actions taken for an investment adviser or federal covered adviser with whom such investment adviser representative is employed or otherwise associated with as shown in the most current information filed by or on behalf of such representative pursuant to section 11-51-403 or 11-51-407 (3).

A person may act as a sales representative for more than one broker-dealer or issuer.

A person may act as an investment adviser representative for more than one investment adviser or federal covered adviser and may also act as an investment adviser representative and a sales representative.

If a licensed sales representative ceases to be employed or otherwise engaged by a broker-dealer or issuer or ceases to act as a sales representative, the broker-dealer or, in the case of a sales representative licensed to act for an issuer, the sales representative shall promptly notify the securities commissioner. A notification required by this subsection (5) may be given by a broker-dealer who is registered as a broker-dealer under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" by filing the information through the central registration depository.

If a licensed investment adviser representative ceases to be employed or otherwise engaged by an investment adviser or federal covered adviser or ceases to act as an investment adviser representative, the investment adviser or federal covered adviser shall promptly notify the securities commissioner.

The license of a broker-dealer, sales representative, or investment adviser representative is effective until terminated by revocation or withdrawal.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 723, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(1)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 554, § 9, effective January 1, 1999.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see Pub.L. 73-291, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

11-51-407. Operating requirements.

The securities commissioner may by rule require licensed broker-dealers who are not registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934":

To satisfy specified minimum financial responsibility requirements;

To file with the securities commissioner specified financial and other information;

To make and maintain specified records and to preserve such records for five years or such other period as may be specified;

To establish written supervisory procedures and a system for applying such procedures that is reasonably expected to prevent and detect violations of this article; and

To acquire and keep in force a fidelity bond in such minimum amount and covering such risks as may be specified.

The securities commissioner may by rule require licensed investment advisers whose principal office and place of business is in this state, and licensed investment advisers whose principal office and place of business is not in this state but that is either not licensed in the state where it maintains its principal office and place of business or not in compliance with such state's financial operating requirements or books and records requirements:

To file with the securities commissioner specified financial and other information;

To make and maintain specified records and to preserve such records for five years or such other period as may be specified; and

To establish written supervisory procedures and a system for applying such procedures that is reasonably expected to prevent and detect violations of this article.

If a broker-dealer or investment adviser at any time knows, or has reason to know, that it is not in compliance with any rule made by the securities commissioner under this subsection (1), the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall promptly notify the securities commissioner of all relevant facts.

The securities commissioner may by rule require licensed broker-dealers who are registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" to make, maintain, and preserve specified records, but no rule made by the securities commissioner under this subsection (2) shall require any broker-dealer to make, maintain, or preserve any records other than those required to be made, maintained, and preserved under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934".

Every licensed broker-dealer, licensed investment adviser, and every licensed sales representative shall file with the securities commissioner such information as may be necessary to correct any information in that person's application for license that is or has become inaccurate in any material respect. The requirements of this subsection (3) may be satisfied by a broker-dealer who is registered as a broker-dealer under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" or by a sales representative licensed to act for such a broker-dealer by filing the correcting information through the central registration depository.

A federal covered adviser who has filed the notice described in section 11-51-403 shall file with the securities commissioner a copy of each amendment filed by such adviser with the securities and exchange commission at the time such amendment is filed with the securities and exchange commission.

Every licensed broker-dealer who is not registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934" shall at all times have in its employment one or more individuals who have passed the written examination required under section 11-51-405 for individuals with supervisory responsibility. Every licensed investment adviser shall at all times have one or more individuals employed or otherwise associated with the investment adviser designated as having supervisory responsibilities over the investment adviser representatives of such adviser. Such individual or individuals shall have primary responsibility to supervise all of the licensed sales representatives of the broker-dealer, or all of the licensed investment adviser representatives of the investment adviser, as the case may be, and, for the purposes of section 11-51-410, each such individual who is not a partner, officer, or director of the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall be deemed a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions as a partner, officer, or director. A broker-dealer or investment adviser who is not in compliance with this subsection (4) shall promptly notify the securities commissioner of all relevant facts.

No investment adviser with its principal office and place of business in this state or investment adviser representative of a licensed investment adviser with a place of business in this state shall take or maintain custody or possession of any funds or securities in which any client of such person has any beneficial interest unless:

All of the securities of each client are segregated, marked to identify the particular client with any beneficial interest therein, and held in safekeeping in some place reasonably free from risk of loss, damage, or destruction; and

All of the funds of each client are deposited in one or more accounts, containing only clients' funds, at a depository institution; and

Each account is maintained in the name of the investment adviser or a federal covered adviser as agent or trustee for such clients; and

A separate record is maintained for each such account that shows the name and address of the depository institution where the account is maintained, the dates and amounts of deposits to and withdrawals from the account, and the exact amount of each client's beneficial interest in the account; and

Written notification is sent to the client giving the place and manner in which the client's funds or securities will be maintained immediately after the investment adviser or investment adviser representative accepts custody or possession of such funds or securities from the client and thereafter, if and when there is any change in the place or manner, written notification is sent to the client explaining the change; and

An itemized statement is sent to each client, at least once every three months, that shows the client's funds and securities in the custody or possession of the investment adviser or investment adviser representative at the end of the period and all debits, credits, and transactions affecting the funds and securities during the period; and

A certified public accountant or, with the prior written consent of the client, a public accountant verifies all funds and securities of clients at least once during each calendar year through an actual examination. Such examination shall be at a time chosen by the accountant without prior notice to the investment adviser or investment adviser representative. The investment adviser shall file with the securities commissioner promptly after each such examination a certificate from the accountant in which such accountant avers to the commissioner that the accountant has performed an examination of the funds and securities accounts, and in which the accountant describes the nature and extent of the examination, and the results and conclusions reached.

The investment adviser or investment adviser representative who has custody of client funds or securities posts bonds in amounts and with conditions the securities commissioner may by rule prescribe, subject to the limitations of section 222 (c) of the federal "Investment Advisers Act of 1940". Any equivalent deposit of cash or securities shall be accepted in lieu of any bonds so required. Every bond shall provide for suit thereon by any person who has a cause of action under section 11-51-604 (3) and (5).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 724, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1), (3), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 555, § 10, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-110 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see Pub.L. 73-291, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.; for the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940", see Pub.L. 76-768, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.

11-51-408. Licensing of successor firms.

A licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser may file an application for a license on behalf of a successor, whether or not the successor is in existence. If a broker-dealer or investment adviser succeeds to and continues the business of a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser and the successor files an application for a license within thirty days after the succession, the license of the predecessor remains effective as the license of the successor for sixty days after the succession. An application filed pursuant to this subsection (1) must satisfy all requirements of an application under this article.

A federal covered adviser may file a notice on behalf of a successor, whether or not the successor is in existence.

If a successor is licensed or authorized to do business in this state pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the license of each sales representative or investment adviser representative licensed to act for the predecessor shall remain effective as a license to act for the successor without a separate filing or payment of a separate fee.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 558, § 11, effective January 1, 1999.

11-51-409. Access to records.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may examine, without notice, the records, within or without this state, of a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser that are required to be made and maintained pursuant to this article in order to determine compliance with this article. A licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser may maintain such records in any form of data storage if the records are readily accessible to the securities commissioner in legible form.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may copy records required to be made and maintained under this article or require a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser, at the expense of the broker-dealer or investment adviser, to copy such records and provide copies to the securities commissioner.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may examine, without notice, the records, within or without this state, of a licensed sales representative or investment adviser representative that are made and maintained by the sales representative or investment adviser representative in the normal course of business in order to determine compliance with this article.

The securities commissioner, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances, may copy records made and maintained by a licensed sales representative or investment adviser representative in the normal course of business or require a licensed sales representative or investment adviser representative, at the sales representative's or investment adviser representative's expense, to copy such records and provide copies to the securities commissioner.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 725, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 558, § 12, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-110 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-409.5. Mandatory disclosure - investment advisers and investment adviser representatives.

Each investment adviser and investment adviser representative of a licensed investment adviser shall furnish a written disclosure statement to each prospective client and to each client who is to receive investment advisory services. Such statement shall, at a minimum, contain the information the securities commissioner by rule requires to be furnished to clients or prospective clients by an investment adviser and an investment adviser representative. In the interests of uniformity, the requirements for disclosure of information under such rules should be coordinated and consistent with those that would be imposed under the federal "Investment Advisers Act of 1940" and the rules promulgated pursuant to that act, and with the requirements of other states, unless the securities commissioner makes the specific finding that to do so would be contrary to the public interest, the protection of investors and advisory clients in this state, and the purposes of this article.

The disclosure statement described in subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered before the client or prospective client incurs any obligation for or in connection with the investment advisory services. In addition, the investment adviser or investment adviser representative shall annually deliver or offer to deliver without charge upon written request of each client a true copy of the most recently available disclosure statement.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 559, § 13, effective January 1, 1999.

Cross references:

For the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940", see Pub.L. 76-768, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.